Arkansas, session 2025, SB633.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-5-905(a)(12), concerning the uses of the
Securities Reserve Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(12) After all distributions and transfers under this section,
less one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) under § 19-3-521(a)(2), for a
transfer by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State on the last business day of
the fiscal year for that fiscal year of the fund balances to the Catastrophic
Reserve Fund shall be held in a sub-fund as necessary to be distributed as
follows:
(A) On July 1, 2025 or upon the effective date of this
Act:
(i) The lesser of the remaining fund balance or one
hundred twenty-five million dollars ($125,000,000) to the Correctional
Facilities Set-Aside in the Restricted Reserve Fund; and
*KMW053*
04/07/2025 4:15:14 PM KMW053

SB633
(ii) On September 2, 2025, any remaining fund
balance, after the transfers under subdivisions (a)(12)(A)(i) of this section
and then any other transfers authorized by the General Assembly, to the
General Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund;
(B) On July 1, 2026:
(i) The lesser of the remaining fund balance or
forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) to the Correctional Facilities Se-
Aside in the Restricted Reserve Fund; and
(ii) On July 3, 2026 any remaining fund balance
after the transfers under subdivisions (a)(12)(B)(i) of this section, and
then any other transfers authorized by the General Assembly, to the General
Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund;
(C) On July 2, 2027:
(i) Any remaining fund balance, after any transfers
authorized by the General Assembly, to the General Revenue Allotment Reserve
Fund; and
(D) For fiscal years beginning on and after July 1, 2028,
on the last business day of the fiscal year the remaining fund balance to the
General Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1004(b), concerning the revenues that
make up the General Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) Unless otherwise provided by law, the General Revenue Allotment Reserve
Fund shall consist of:
(1) The remainder of the general revenues collected by the state after
deductions as specified in § 19-5-202 have been made and which are not
required to fulfill the requirements of the maximum allotments of general
revenues as may be provided in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 et
seq., for the fiscal year in which the general revenues were collected and
deposited into the State Treasury; and
(2) The portion not determined to be special revenues by § 19-6-110 of the
year-end fund balances of the funds and fund accounts created in § 19-5-302,
except for § 19-5-302(11)(A), and in § 19-5-304(2)--(7) and (10), §§ 19-5-
306, 19-5-307, 19-6-404, and 19-6-411, which fund balances are to be
transferred on or before August 15 of the fiscal year next following the
04/07/2025 4:15:14 PM KMW053

SB633
fiscal year during which balances accrued.
(3) The remaining fund balance in the Securities Reserve Fund under § 19-
5-905(a)(12).

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. PRISON CONSTRUCTION FUND TRANSFER.
Immediately upon the effective date of this Act, the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State shall transfer on his or her books and those of the State Treasurer
and the Auditor of the State the sum of two hundred and fifty million dollars
($250,000,000) from the General Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund to the
Correctional Facilities Set-Aside in the Restricted Reserve Fund, which shall
be in addition to existing balances in the Correctional Facilities Set-Aside
as established in Section 3(a)(2) of Act 561 of 2023.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. PRISON CONSTRUCTION REPORTING REQUIREMENTS.
(a) The Department of Corrections shall report quarterly to the Arkansas
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee the status of all prison
construction activity that will not compromise the security or compromise the
integrity of the facility, to include the following:
(1) Projected cost summaries, which shall include budgeted amounts,
expenditures, funds balances, projected funding and the source of funds;
(2) Summary of the design of the facility, that may be provided without
any risk of a breach of security;
(3) A summary of any contract bidding process related to the construction
of the prison;
(4) A summary of any contracts awarded, notice to proceed, methods of
finance, grant awards, which shall include contract and grant amount(s), and
the amount(s) paid to date;
(5) Schedule of timelines and milestones, which shall include,
construction start, construction completion and occupancy;
(6) Summary of the number of beds and style of beds;
(7) Plans for inmate programming at the prison facility;
(8) Projected activity for the next quarter; and
(9) Any other information as requested by the Arkansas Legislative Council
or Joint Budget Committee.
(b) The provisions of this section shall be in effect from July 1, 2025
through the completion of the Prison Construction Project.
04/07/2025 4:15:14 PM KMW053

SB633

SECTION 5. DO NOT CODIFY. Conditions and Audit. (a) Transfer of
funds from the "Restricted Reserve Fund" shall be made only after the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State has determined that all criteria or pre-
conditions established in the appropriation act to receive the transfer have
been met and that a Method of Finance has been filed with the Office of
Accounting in the Department of Finance and Administration, if required.
(b) Any matching funds as may be provided in law shall be certified to
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State prior to the commencement of the
project.
(c) Any recipient of the funds appropriated herein are also subject to
an audit by the Arkansas Legislative Audit of the Legislative Joint Auditing
Committee in order to determine that the use of the funds was in compliance
with the intent and appropriated purposes of the General Assembly.

SECTION 6. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act upon passage and approval is essential to allow
transfers which can provide an additional funding mechanism for the
construction and operation of a state prison, as well as to address
unforeseen needs, and a delay in its effectiveness could work irreparable
harm upon the proper transfer of funds, administration and provision of
essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared
to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect upon
passage and approval. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the
Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time
during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the
Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date
the last house overrides the veto.





04/07/2025 4:15:14 PM KMW053